hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Pribor za bicikle > Oprema za biciklistička računala: Baterije za biciklistička računala; Senzori ritma za biciklistička računala; Spremnici za za biciklistička računala; Punjači za biciklistička računala; Zasloni za biciklistička računala; Držači za za biciklistička računala; Senzori obrtaja za biciklistička računala; Odašiljači za biciklistička računala
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Accessori per biciclette > Accessori computer per biciclette: Batterie per computer per bicicletta; Sensori di cadenza computer per bicicletta; Custodie per computer per bicicletta; Caricabatterie per ciclocomputer; Display per ciclocomputer; Supporti per computer per bicicletta; Sensori RPM per computer per bicicletta; Trasmettitori per computer per bicicletta
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių priedai > Dviračių kompiuterių priedai: Dviračių kompiuterių akumuliatoriai; Dviračio kompiuterių apsukų jutikliai; Dviračių kompiuterių dėklai; Dviračių kompiuterių įkrovikliai; Dviračių kompiuterių ekranai; Dviračių kompiuterių laikikliai; Dviračių kompiuterių apsukų jutikliai; Dviračių kompiuterių siųstuvai
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อุปกรณ์จักรยาน > อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์สำหรับจักรยาน: แบตเตอรี่คอมพิวเตอร์สำหรับจักรยาน; เซ็นเซอร์วัดรอบขาของคอมพิวเตอร์บนจักรยาน; เคสใส่คอมพิวเตอร์บนจักรยาน; ที่ชาร์จคอมพิวเตอร์จักรยาน; หน้าจอไมล์จักรยาน; ที่ยึดคอมพิวเตอร์บนจักรยาน; เซ็นเซอร์วัดค่าความเร็วรอบของคอมพิวเตอร์บนจักรยาน; ตัวส่งข้อมูลคอมพิวเตอร์บนจักรยาน
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Αξεσουάρ ποδηλάτου > Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου: Μπαταρίες υπολογιστών ποδηλάτων; Αισθητήρες ρυθμού υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου; Θήκες υπολογιστών ποδηλάτων; Φορτιστές υπολογιστών ποδηλάτου; Οθόνες υπολογιστών ποδηλάτου; Βάσεις υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου; Αισθητήρες στροφών (RPM) υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου; Πομποί υπολογιστή ποδηλάτου
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Príslušenstvo pre bicykle > Príslušenstvo k cyklopočítačom: Batérie do cyklopočítačov; Cyklopočítačové snímače kadencie; Puzdrá na cyklopočítače; Nabíjačky na cyklistické počítače; Displeje na bicykle; Držiaky na cyklopočítače; Snímače otáčok cyklopočítača; Vysielače cyklopočítača
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Aksesuarları > Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Aksesuarları: Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Pilleri; Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Tempo Sensörleri; Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Kılıfları; Bisiklet bilgisayarı şarj cihazları; Bisiklet bilgisayarı ekranları; Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Montaj Parçaları; Bisiklet Bilgisayarı RPM Sensörleri; Bisiklet Bilgisayar Vericileri
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Akcesoria do rowerów > Akcesoria elektroniczne do rowerów: Baterie do komputerów rowerowych; Czujniki kadencji komputera rowerowego; Obudowy do liczników rowerowych; Ładowarki do komputerów rowerowych; Wyświetlacze do komputerów rowerowych; Uchwyty do liczników rowerowych; Czujniki obrotów liczników rowerowych; Nadajniki do liczników rowerowych
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsaccessoires > Accessoires voor fietscomputers: Accu's en batterijen voor fietscomputers; Cadanssensoren voor fietscomputers; Dozen voor fietscomputers; Fietscomputer-opladers; Fietscomputer-displays; Bevestigingen voor fietscomputers; Toerentalsensoren voor fietscomputers; Transmitters voor fietscomputers
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Accesorios para bicicletas > Accesorios de computadora para bicicletas: Baterías de computadoras para bicicletas; Sensores de cadencia para computadoras de bicicleta; Cajas de computadoras para bicicletas; Cargadores para computadoras de bicicleta; Pantallas para computadoras de bicicleta; Soportes para computadoras de bicicleta; Sensores de RPM de la computadora de bicicleta; Transmisores de computadora para bicicleta
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeltilbehør > Datatilbehør til sykkel: Batterier til sykkelcomputere; Tråkkfrekvenssensorer til sykkercomputere; Etuier til sykkelcomputere; Ladere til sykkelcomputer; Skjermer til sykkelcomputer; Fester til sykkelcomputere; RPM-sensorer til sykkelcomputere; Sendere til sykkelcomputere
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Accesorii pentru biciclete > Accesorii computer pentru biciclete: Baterii computer pentru biciclete; Senzori de cadență pentru computer biciclete; Carcase computer pentru biciclete; Încărcătoare pentru ciclocomputer; Afișaje pentru ciclocomputer; Suporturi computer pentru biciclete; Senzori RPM computer pentru biciclete; Transmițători computer pentru biciclete
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車配件 > 自行車碼表配件: 自行車碼表電池; 自行車碼表踏頻感應器; 自行車碼表保護殼; 自行車車錶充電器; 自行車車錶顯示器; 自行車碼表支架; 自行車碼表 RPM 感應器; 自行車碼表發射器
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Аксессуары для велосипедов > Аксессуары для велокомпьютеров: Аккумуляторы для велокомпьютеров; Магнитные датчики частоты вращения педалей для велокомпьютеров; Чехлы для велокомпьютеров; Зарядные устройства для велокомпьютеров; Дисплеи для велокомпьютеров; Крепления для велокомпьютеров; Безмагнитные датчики частоты вращения педалей для велокомпьютеров; Передатчики для велокомпьютеров
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Dodatki za kolesa > Dodatki za kolesarski računalnik: Baterije za kolesarski računalnik; Senzorji kadence za kolesarski računalnik; Ohišja za kolesarski računalnik; Računalniški polnilniki za kolesa; Računalniški zasloni za kolesa; Nosilci za kolesarski računalnik; Merilniki obratov za kolesarski računalnik; Oddajniki za kolesarski računalnik
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Pyöräilytarvikkeet > Polkupyörätietokoneiden lisätarvikkeet: Polkupyörätietokoneen paristot; Polkupyörätietokoneen rytmianturit; Polkupyörätietokoneen kotelot; Pyörätietokoneiden laturit; Pyörätietokoneiden näytöt; Polkupyörätietokoneen kiinnikkeet; Polkupyörätietokoneen kierrosnopeusanturit; Polkupyörätietokoneen lähettimet
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradzubehör > Zubehör für Fahrradcomputer: Akkus für Fahrrad-Computer; Taktsensoren für Fahrradcomputer; Taschen für Fahrrad-Computer; Ladegeräte für Fahrradcomputer; Displays für Fahrradcomputer; Befestigungen für Fahrrad-Computer; Drehzahlsensoren für Fahrradcomputer; Fahrradcomputer-Sender
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpár-kiegészítők > Kerékpárkomputer-kiegészítők: Kerékpárkomputer-akkumulátorok; Kerékpárkomputer-pedálfordulatérzékelők; Kerékpárkomputer-tokok; Kerékpárkomputer-töltők; Kerékpárkomputer-kijelzők; Kerékpárkomputer-tartók; Kerékpárkomputer-fordulatszámérzékelők; Kerékpárkomputer-jeladók
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Accessoires de cyclisme > Accessoires de cyclomètres: Batteries pour ordinateur de vélo; Capteurs de cadence pour ordinateur de vélo; Étuis pour ordinateurs de vélo; Chargeurs pour compteurs de vélo; Écrans pour compteurs de vélo; Supports pour ordinateur de vélo; Capteur de cadence pour ordinateur de vélo; Émetteurs d'ordinateur de vélo
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Jízdní kola – příslušenství > Cyklopočítače – příslušenství: Baterie pro cyklopočítače; Senzory kadence pro cyklopočítače; Pouzdra na cyklopočítače; Nabíječky k cyklopočítačům; Displeje k cyklopočítačům; Držáky na cyklopočítače; RPM senzory pro cyklopočítače; Vysílače pro cyklopočítače
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicleta > Acessórios de computador para bicicleta: Pilhas para computador de bicicleta; Sensores de cadência para computador de bicicleta; Caixas para computador de bicicleta; Carregadores de ciclómetros; Ecrãs de ciclómetros; Suportes para computador de bicicleta; Sensores de RPM para computador de bicicleta; Transmissores para computador de bicicleta
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeltillbehör > Tillbehör till cykeldatorer: Batterier till cykeldatorer; Kadenssensorer för cykeldator; Fodral till cykeldatorer; Laddare till cykeldatorer; Cykeldatordisplayer; Cykeldatorfästen; Varvräknarsensorer för cykeldator; Cykeldatorsändare
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Аксесоари за велосипеди > Аксесоари за компютърни устройства за велосипед: Батерии за компютърни устройства за велосипед; Компютърни сензори за каданс; Калъфи за велосипедни компютри; Зарядни устройства за компютър за велосипед; Компютърни дисплеи за велосипед; Стойки за компютър за велосипеди; Сензори за обороти на велосипеден компютър; Велосипедни компютърни предаватели
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Acessórios para bicicletas > Acessórios para computador de bicicleta: Baterias para computador de bicicleta; Sensores de cadência para computador de bicicleta; Capas para computador de bicicleta; Carregadores de computador de bicicleta; Telas de computador de bicicleta; Suportes para computador de bicicleta; Sensores de RPM para computador de bicicleta; Transmissores de computador para bicicleta
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Linh kiện xe đạp > Phụ kiện cho đồng hồ xe đạp: Pin máy tính xe đạp; Cảm biến nhịp máy tính xe đạp; Ốp máy tính xe đạp; Bộ sạc máy tính xe đạp; Màn hình máy tính xe đạp; Khung gắn máy tính xe đạp; Cảm biến RPM máy tính xe đạp; Bộ truyền tín hiệu máy tính xe đạp
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車関連用品 > サイクルコンピューター関連用品: サイクルコンピューターのバッテリー; サイクルコンピューターのケイデンスセンサー; サイクルコンピューターケース; サイクルコンピューター充電器; サイクルコンピューターディスプレイ; サイクルコンピューターマウント; サイクルコンピューターRPMセンサー; サイクルコンピューターのトランスミッター
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Accessories > Bicycle Computer Accessories: Bicycle Computer Batteries; Bicycle Computer Cadence Sensors; Bicycle Computer Cases; Bicycle Computer Chargers; Bicycle Computer Displays; Bicycle Computer Mounts; Bicycle Computer RPM Sensors; Bicycle Computer Transmitters
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부대용품 > 자전거 컴퓨터 부대용품: 자전거 컴퓨터 배터리; 자전거 컴퓨터 케이던스 센서; 자전거 컴퓨터 케이스; 자전거 컴퓨터 충전기; 자전거 컴퓨터 디스플레이; 자전거 컴퓨터 장착용품; 자전거 컴퓨터 RPM 센서; 자전거 컴퓨터 송신기
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车配件 > 自行车码表配件: 自行车码表电池; 自行车码表踏频传感器; 自行车码表盒; 自行车码表充电器; 自行车码表显示屏; 自行车码表架; 自行车码表转速传感器; 自行车码表发射器
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeltilbehør > Cykelcomputere – tilbehør: Cykelcomputere – batterier; Cykelcomputere – kadencesensorer; Cykelcomputere – etuier; Opladere til cykelcomputere; Skærme til cykelcomputere; Cykelcomputere – beslag; Cykelcomputere – omdrejningssensorer; Cykelcomputere – transmittere